Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5395.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Authority" means a brownfield redevelopment authority created under this act. (b) "Baseline environmental assessment" means that term as defined in part 201 or 213. (c) "Blighted" means property that meets any of the following criteria as determined by the governing body: (i) Has been declared a public nuisance in accordance with a local housing, building, plumbing, fire, or other related code or ordinance. (ii) Is an attractive nuisance to children because of physical condition, use, or occupancy. (iii) Is a fire hazard or is otherwise dangerous to the safety of persons or property. (iv) Has had the utilities, plumbing, heating, or sewerage permanently disconnected, destroyed, removed, or rendered ineffective so that the property is unfit for its intended use. (v) Is previously developed or tax reverted property owned by a municipality or by this state. The sale, lease, or transfer of previously developed or tax reverted property by a municipality or this state after the property's inclusion in a brownfield plan does not result in the loss to the property of the status as blighted property for purposes of this act. (vi) Is property owned by or under the control of a land bank fast track authority, whether or not located within a qualified local governmental unit. Property included within a brownfield plan before the date it meets the requirements of this subdivision to be eligible property is considered to become eligible property as of the date the property is determined to have been or becomes qualified as, or is combined with, other eligible property. The sale, lease, or transfer of the property by a land bank fast track authority after the property's inclusion in a brownfield plan does not result in the loss to the property of the status as blighted property for purposes of this act. (vii) Has substantial buried subsurface demolition debris present so that the property is unfit for its intended use. (d) "Board" means the board that supervises and controls an authority under section 5. (e) "Brownfield plan" means a plan that meets the requirements of sections 13 and 13b and is adopted under section 14. (f) "Captured taxable value" means the amount in 1 year by which the current taxable value of an eligible property subject to a brownfield plan, including the taxable value or assessed value, as appropriate, of the property for which specific taxes are paid in lieu of property taxes, exceeds the initial taxable value of that eligible property. The state tax commission shall prescribe the method for calculating captured taxable value. (g) "Chief executive officer" means the mayor of a city, the village manager of a village, the township supervisor of a township, or the county executive of a county or, if the county does not have an elected county executive, the chairperson of the county board of commissioners. (h) "Combined brownfield plan" means a brownfield plan that also includes the information necessary to submit the plan to the department, Michigan state housing development authority, or Michigan strategic fund under section 15(20). (i) "Construction period tax capture revenues" means funds equal to the amount of income tax levied and imposed in a calendar year on wages paid to individuals physically present and working within the eligible property for the construction, renovation, or other improvement of eligible property that is an eligible activity within a transformational brownfield plan. As used in this subdivision, "wages" means that term as defined in section 3401 of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 3401. To calculate the amount of construction period tax capture revenues for a calendar year under a transformational brownfield plan, the state treasurer shall do all of the following: (i) Require the owner or developer of the eligible property to report the total taxable wages paid to individuals for the construction, renovation, or other improvement of eligible property that is an eligible activity within the transformational brownfield plan. The wages reported under this subparagraph must exclude any wages paid to employees of the owner or developer. (ii) Multiply the amount under subparagraph (i) by the effective rate as determined by the state treasurer at which the income tax is levied on an individual in this state. The state treasurer shall estimate the effective rate by taking into account the effect of any exemptions, additions, subtractions, and credits allowable under part 1 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.532. The state treasurer may require the owner or developer to submit any information necessary for the calculation under this subparagraph. (iii) The wage information and other information required under this subdivision must be provided to the department of treasury by the owner or developer in a manner prescribed by the state treasurer. The state treasurer may require the owner or developer to provide a review or reconciliation of the wages by an independent auditing firm. (j) "Corrective action" means that term as defined in part 111 or part 213. (k) "Department" means the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (l) "Department specific activities" means baseline environmental assessments, due care activities, response activities, and other environmentally related actions that are eligible activities and are identified as a part of a brownfield plan that are in addition to the minimum due care activities required by part 201, including, but not limited to: (i) Response activities that are more protective of the public health, safety, and welfare and the environment than required by section 20107a, 20114, or 21304c of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.20107a, 324.20114, and 324.21304c. (ii) Removal and closure of underground storage tanks pursuant to part 211 or 213. (iii) Disposal of solid waste, as defined in part 115 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11501 to 324.11587, from the eligible property, if the solid waste was not generated or accumulated by the authority or the developer. (iv) Dust control related to construction activities. (v) Removal and disposal of lake or river sediments exceeding part 201 criteria from, at, or related to an economic development project if the upland property is either a facility or would become a facility as a result of the deposition of dredged spoils. (vi) Industrial cleaning. (vii) Sheeting and shoring necessary for the removal of materials exceeding part 201 criteria at projects requiring a permit pursuant to part 301, 303, or 325 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.30101 to 324.30113, 324.30301 to 324.30328, and 324.32501 to 324.32515a. (viii) Lead, mold, or asbestos abatement when lead, mold, or asbestos pose an imminent and significant threat to human health. (ix) Environmental insurance. (m) "Due care activities" means those response activities identified as part of a brownfield plan that are necessary to allow the owner or operator of an eligible property in the plan to comply with the requirements of section 20107a or 21304c of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.20107a and 324.21304c. (n) "Economic opportunity zone" means 1 or more parcels of property that meet all of the following: (i) That together are 40 or more acres in size. (ii) That contain or contained a manufacturing operation or an enclosed mall that consists or consisted of 300,000 or more square feet. (iii) That are located in a municipality that is contiguous to a qualified local governmental unit. (o) "Eligible activities" or "eligible activity" means 1 or more of the following: (i) For all eligible properties, eligible activities include all of the following: (A) Department specific activities. (B) Relocation of public buildings or operations for economic development purposes. (C) Reasonable costs of environmental insurance. (D) Reasonable costs incurred to develop and prepare brownfield plans, combined brownfield plans, or work plans for the eligible property, including legal and consulting fees that are not in the ordinary course of acquiring and developing real estate. (E) Reasonable costs of brownfield plan and work plan implementation, including, but not limited to, tracking and reporting of data and plan compliance, including costs to implement, monitor, and maintain compliance with the income and price monitoring responsibilities associated with housing development activities, and the reasonable costs incurred to estimate and determine actual costs incurred, whether those costs are incurred by a municipality, authority, or private developer. (F) Demolition of structures or site improvements that are not a response activity, including removal of manufactured debris composed of discarded, unused, or unusable manufactured by-products left on the site by a previous owner. The removal of the manufactured by-products left on the site described in this sub-subparagraph is not eligible for interest reimbursement under sub-subparagraph (H). (G) Lead, asbestos, or mold abatement. (H) Except as otherwise provided in sub-subparagraph (F), the repayment of principal of and interest on any obligation issued by an authority to pay the costs of eligible activities attributable to an eligible property. (ii) For housing property located in a community that has identified a specific housing need and has absorption data or job growth data included in the brownfield plan, eligible activities include all of the following: (A) The activities described in subparagraph (i). (B) Housing development activities. (C) Infrastructure improvements that are necessary for housing property and support housing development activities. (D) Site preparation that is not a response activity and that supports housing development activities. (iii) For eligible properties located in a qualified local governmental unit, or an economic opportunity zone, or that are a former mill, eligible activities include all of the following: (A) The activities described in subparagraph (i). (B) Infrastructure improvements that directly benefit eligible property. (C) Site preparation that is not a response activity. (iv) For eligible properties that are owned by or under the control of a land bank fast track authority, or a municipality or authority, eligible activities include all of the following: (A) The eligible activities described in subparagraphs (i), (ii), and (iii). (B) Assistance to a land bank fast track authority in clearing or quieting title to, or selling or otherwise conveying, property owned by or under the control of a land bank fast track authority or the acquisition of property by the land bank fast track authority if the acquisition of the property is for economic development purposes. (C) Assistance to a municipality or authority in clearing or quieting title to, or selling or otherwise conveying, property owned by or under the control of a municipality or authority or the acquisition of property by a qualified local governmental unit or authority if the acquisition of the property is for economic development purposes. (v) For eligible activities on eligible property that is included in a transformational brownfield plan, any demolition, construction, restoration, alteration, renovation, or improvement of buildings or site improvements on eligible property, including infrastructure improvements that directly benefit eligible property. (vi) For eligible activities on eligible property that is a qualified facility that is not located in a qualified local governmental unit and that is a facility, functionally obsolete, or blighted, the following additional activities: (A) The activities described in subparagraph (i). (B) Infrastructure improvements that directly benefit eligible property. (C) Site preparation that is not a response activity. (vii) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subparagraph, for eligible activities on eligible property that is described in subdivision (p)(i), the following additional activities: (A) The activities described in subparagraph (i). (B) Reasonable costs incurred to acquire eligible property. For purposes of this sub-subparagraph, costs are not reasonable if the costs exceed the fair market value of the eligible property at the time of acquisition. (C) Any demolition, construction, restoration, alteration, renovation, or improvement of buildings or site improvements on eligible property, including infrastructure improvements that directly benefit eligible property. (D) Site preparation that is not a response activity. (E) Any necessary environmental remediation not described in subparagraph (i). (p) "Eligible property" means either of the following: (i) Except as otherwise provided in sub-subparagraph (G), property for which eligible activities are identified under a brownfield plan that was used or is currently used for commercial, industrial, public, or residential purposes, including personal property located on the property, or former dumps, landfills, and other areas filled with nonnative material, to the extent included in the brownfield plan, and that meets 1 or more of the following conditions listed in sub-subparagraphs (A) to (F): (A) Is in a qualified local governmental unit and is a facility or a site or property as those terms are defined in part 213, historic resource, functionally obsolete, or blighted and includes parcels that are adjacent or contiguous to that property if the development of the adjacent and contiguous parcels is estimated to increase the captured taxable value of that property. (B) Is not in a qualified local governmental unit and is a facility, historic resource, functionally obsolete, blighted, or a site or property as those terms are defined in part 213, and includes parcels that are adjacent or contiguous to that property if the development of the adjacent and contiguous parcels is estimated to increase the captured taxable value of that property. (C) Is tax reverted property owned by or under the control of a land bank fast track authority. (D) Is a transit-oriented development or transit-oriented property. (E) Is located in a qualified local governmental unit and contains a targeted redevelopment area. (F) Is undeveloped property that was eligible property in a previously approved brownfield plan abolished under section 14(8). (G) Eligible property does not include qualified agricultural property exempt under section 7ee of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7ee, from the tax levied by a local school district for school operating purposes to the extent provided under section 1211 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1211. (ii) Housing property for which eligible activities are identified under a brownfield plan, including personal property located on the property, to the extent included in the brownfield plan. (q) "Environmental insurance" means liability insurance for environmental contamination and cleanup that is not otherwise required by state or federal law. (r) "Facility" means that term as defined in part 201. (s) "Fiscal year" means the fiscal year of the authority. (t) "Former mill" means a former mill that has not been used for industrial purposes for the immediately preceding 2 years, that is not located in a qualified local governmental unit, that is a facility or is a site or a property as those terms are defined in part 213, functionally obsolete, or blighted, and that is located within 15 miles of a river that is a federal superfund site listed under the comprehensive environmental response, compensation and liability act of 1980, 42 USC 9601 to 9675, and that is located in a municipality with a population of less than 10,000. (u) "Functionally obsolete" means that the property is unable to be used to adequately perform the function for which it was intended due to a substantial loss in value resulting from factors such as overcapacity, changes in technology, deficiencies or superadequacies in design, or other similar factors that affect the property itself or the property's relationship with other surrounding property. (v) "Governing body" means the elected body having legislative powers of a municipality creating an authority under this act. (w) "Historic resource" means that term as defined in section 90a of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090a. (x) "Housing development activities" means 1 or more of the following: (i) Reimbursement provided to owners of rental housing units for qualified rehabilitation. (ii) Costs for infrastructure available for public use and safety improvements necessary for a housing project. (iii) Costs of demolition and renovation of existing buildings and site preparation, to the extent necessary to accommodate an income qualified purchaser household or income qualified renting household. (iv) Temporary household relocation costs for an income qualified household for a period not to exceed 1 year. (v) Acquisition cost for blighted or obsolete rental units, to the extent the acquisition would promote rehabilitation or adaptive reuse of the blighted or obsolete rental unit to accommodate an income qualified purchaser household or income qualified renting household. (vi) Reimbursement provided to a developer to fill a financing gap associated with the development of housing units priced for income qualified households and to assist with costs related to infrastructure improvements and site preparation that are not a response activity and that are necessary for new housing development for income qualified households on eligible property. (y) "Housing property" means 1 or more of the following: (i) A property on which 1 or more units of residential housing are proposed to be constructed, rehabilitated, or otherwise designed to be used as a dwelling. (ii) One or more units of residential housing proposed to be constructed or rehabilitated and located in a mixed-use project. (z) "Income qualified household" means a person, a family, or unrelated persons living together, whose annual household income is not more than 120% of the area median income. As used in this subdivision: (i) "Area median income" means the median income for the area as determined under section 8 of the United States housing act of 1937, 42 USC 1437f, adjusted for family size. (ii) "Household income" means all income received by all individuals who are not less than 24 years of age when the household income is determined and who reside in a household while members of the household. (aa) "Income qualified purchaser household" means a purchaser who is, or who is a member of, an income qualified household. (bb) "Income qualified renting household" means a renter who is, or who is a member of, an income qualified household. (cc) "Income tax" means the tax levied and imposed under part 1 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.532. (dd) "Income tax capture revenues" means, with respect to each eligible property subject to a transformational brownfield plan, funds equal to the amount for each tax year by which the aggregate income tax from individuals residing within the eligible property subject to a transformational brownfield plan exceeds the initial income tax value. Subject to subparagraph (iii), the state treasurer shall calculate annually the income tax capture revenues associated with each transformational brownfield plan. In calculating income tax capture revenues, the state treasurer shall subtract from the aggregate amount of income tax credits under sections 255, 265, 266, and chapter 9 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.255, 206.265, 206.266, and 206.501 to 206.532. The state treasurer shall require the owner or developer of the eligible property to provide to the department of treasury all of the following information at the end of each calendar year, including the year in which the resolution adding that eligible property in the transformational brownfield plan is adopted: (i) A list of addresses for all residential units, rental or owner-occupied, within the eligible property. (ii) Any other information that may be necessary to calculate the income tax capture revenues. The information required under this subdivision must be provided in a manner prescribed by the state treasurer. (iii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subdivision, instead of the reporting and calculation methods otherwise provided for, the owner or developer of a transformational brownfield project site may elect to utilize a safe harbor method of calculating income tax capture revenues. Under this safe harbor method, the Michigan strategic fund shall establish a safe harbor amount of annual income tax capture revenues for each eligible property when the Michigan strategic fund approves the transformational brownfield plan, and those amounts shall serve as the basis for the transmittal of income tax capture revenues to the owner or developer of the transformational project site under section 8a(4). The Michigan strategic fund shall establish the safe harbor amount for an eligible property by imputing a standard annual taxable income for households residing within the eligible property or portion of the eligible property. The safe harbor is effective only to the extent that the residential units within the eligible property or portion of the eligible property are actively leased or, in the case of units made available for sale, sold in an arms-length transaction. Imputations as to standard household taxable income may vary based on location and other relevant factors. The Michigan strategic fund may adjust the safe harbor amount for an eligible property, or portion of the eligible property, after the time of transformational brownfield plan approval as required to reflect changes in the transformational brownfield plan for the transformational project site that may occur after approval of the transformational brownfield plan, if those changes do not result in an aggregate increase in the level of income tax capture revenues from the amount initially established. The owner or developer of the transformational project site may elect to utilize the safe harbor method of accounting at any time before the first reimbursement of income tax capture revenues under the transformational brownfield plan. An election to utilize the safe harbor method of accounting, once made, cannot be rescinded. (ee) "Industrial cleaning" means cleaning or removal of contaminants from within a structure necessary to achieve the intended use of the property. (ff) "Infrastructure improvements" means a street, road, sidewalk, parking facility, pedestrian mall, alley, bridge, sewer, sewage treatment plant, property designed to reduce, eliminate, or prevent the spread of identified soil or groundwater contamination, drainage system, waterway, waterline, water storage facility, rail line, utility line or pipeline, transit-oriented development, transit-oriented property, or other similar or related structure or improvement, together with necessary easements for the structure or improvement, owned or used by a public agency or functionally connected to similar or supporting property owned or used by a public agency, or designed and dedicated to use by, for the benefit of, or for the protection of the health, welfare, or safety of the public generally, whether or not used by a single business entity, if any road, street, or bridge is continuously open to public access and other property is located in public easements or rights-of-way and sized to accommodate reasonably foreseeable development of eligible property in adjoining areas. Infrastructure improvements also include 1 or more of the following whether publicly or privately owned or operated or located on public or private property: (i) Underground parking. (ii) Multilevel parking structures. (iii) Urban stormwater management systems. (gg) "Initial income tax value" means, with respect to each eligible property subject to a transformational brownfield plan, the aggregate amount of income tax less credits under sections 255, 265, 266, and chapter 9 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.255, 206.265, 206.266, and 206.501 to 206.532, from individuals residing within the eligible property for the tax year in which the resolution adding that eligible property in the transformational brownfield plan is adopted. (hh) "Initial sales and use tax value" means, with respect to each eligible property subject to a transformational brownfield plan, the aggregate amount of sales tax and use tax collected from persons located within the eligible property for the tax year in which the resolution adding that eligible property in the transformational brownfield plan is adopted. For persons with multiple business locations, the applicable amount of sales tax and use tax for purposes of this act is only the sales tax and use tax collections attributable to the business location within the eligible property. (ii) "Initial taxable value" means the taxable value of an eligible property identified in and subject to a brownfield plan at the time the resolution adding that eligible property in the brownfield plan is adopted, as shown either by the most recent assessment roll for which equalization has been completed at the time the resolution is adopted or, if provided by the brownfield plan, by the next assessment roll for which equalization will be completed following the date the resolution adding that eligible property in the brownfield plan is adopted. Property exempt from taxation at the time the initial taxable value is determined is included with the initial taxable value of zero. Property for which a specific tax is paid in lieu of property tax is not considered exempt from taxation. The state tax commission shall prescribe the method for calculating the initial taxable value of property for which a specific tax was paid in lieu of property tax. The initial assessed value may be modified by lowering the initial assessed value once during the term of the brownfield plan through an amendment as provided in section 14 after the tax increment financing plan fails to generate captured taxes for 3 consecutive years due to declines in assessed value. (jj) "Initial withholding tax value" means, with respect to each eligible property subject to a transformational brownfield plan, the amount of income tax withheld under chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.701 to 206.715, 206.718, from individuals employed within the eligible property for the calendar year in which the resolution adding the eligible property to the plan is adopted. The initial withholding tax value does not include construction period tax capture revenues. (kk) "Land bank fast track authority" means an authority created under the land bank fast track act, 2003 PA 258, MCL 124.751 to 124.774. (ll) "Local taxes" means all taxes levied other than taxes levied for school operating purposes. (mm) "Michigan state housing development authority" means the Michigan state housing development authority created in section 21 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1421. (nn) "Michigan strategic fund" means the Michigan strategic fund created under the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2001 to 125.2094. (oo) "Mixed-use" means a real estate project with planned integration of some combination of retail, office, residential, or hotel uses. (pp) "Municipality" means all of the following: (i) A city. (ii) A village. (iii) A township in those areas of the township that are outside of a village. (iv) A township in those areas of the township that are in a village on the concurrence by resolution of the village in which the zone would be located. (v) A county. (qq) "Owned by or under the control of" means that a land bank fast track authority, a municipality, or a qualified local governmental unit has 1 or more of the following: (i) An ownership interest in the property. (ii) A tax lien on the property. (iii) A tax deed to the property. (iv) A contract with this state or a political subdivision of this state to enforce a lien on the property. (v) A right to collect delinquent taxes, penalties, or interest on the property. (vi) The ability to exercise its authority over the property. (rr) "Part 111", "part 201", "part 211", or "part 213" means that part as described as follows: (i) Part 111 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11101 to 324.11153. (ii) Part 201 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.20101 to 324.20142. (iii) Part 211 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.21101 to 324.21113. (iv) Part 213 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.21301a to 324.21334. (ss) "Previously developed property" means property that was part of an existing developed residential, commercial, or industrial zone and contained a structure serviced by utilities, or former dumps, landfills, and other areas filled with nonnative material. (tt) "Qualified facility" means a landfill facility area of 15 or more contiguous acres that is located in a city and that contains, contained, or is adjacent to a landfill, a material recycling facility, or an asphalt plant that is no longer in operation. (uu) "Qualified local governmental unit" means that term as defined in the obsolete property rehabilitation act, 2000 PA 146, MCL 125.2781 to 125.2797. (vv) "Qualified rehabilitation" means rehabilitation of existing structures that is necessary to make a housing unit suitable for sale to an income qualified purchaser household or rent to an income qualified renting household. Qualified rehabilitation also includes proposed rehabilitation that will bring the structure into conformance with minimum local building code standards for occupancy or improve the livability of the units while meeting minimum local building code standards. As used in this subsection, "existing structures" includes any structure designed to be used as a dwelling. (ww) "Qualified taxpayer" means that term as defined in sections 38d and 38g of former 1975 PA 228, or section 437 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1437, or a recipient of a community revitalization incentive as described in section 90a of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090a. (xx) "Release" means that term as defined in part 201 or part 213. (yy) "Response activity" means either of the following: (i) Response activity as that term is defined in part 201. (ii) Corrective action. (zz) "Sales tax" means the tax levied under the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.51 to 205.78. (aaa) "Sales and use tax capture revenues" means, with respect to each eligible property subject to a transformational brownfield plan, the amount for each calendar year by which the sales tax and use tax collected from persons within the eligible property exceeds the initial sales and use tax value. For persons with multiple business locations, the applicable amount of sales tax and use tax for purposes of this act is only the sales tax and use tax collections attributable to the business location within the eligible property. To calculate sales and use tax capture revenues for a calendar year under a transformational brownfield plan, the state treasurer or the Michigan strategic fund shall do all of the following: (i) The state treasurer shall develop methods and processes that are necessary for each applicable person within the eligible property to report the amount of sales and use tax from that location. (ii) The Michigan strategic fund shall include all of the following provisions in the development or reimbursement agreement for any transformational brownfield plan that utilizes sales and use tax capture revenues: (A) That the owner or developer of the eligible property shall require each applicable person occupying the eligible property to comply with the reporting requirements under this section through a contract requirement, lease requirement, or other similar means. (B) That reimbursement of sales and use tax capture revenues is limited to amounts that are reported in accordance with this section, and this state has no obligation with respect to sales and use tax capture revenues that are not reported or paid. (bbb) "Specific taxes" means all of the following: (i) A tax levied under any of the following: (A) 1974 PA 198, MCL 207.551 to 207.572. (B) The commercial redevelopment act, 1978 PA 255, MCL 207.651 to 207.668. (C) The enterprise zone act, 1985 PA 224, MCL 125.2101 to 125.2123. (D) 1953 PA 189, MCL 211.181 to 211.182. (E) The technology park development act, 1984 PA 385, MCL 207.701 to 207.718. (F) The obsolete property rehabilitation act, 2000 PA 146, MCL 125.2781 to 125.2797. (G) The neighborhood enterprise zone act, 1992 PA 147, MCL 207.771 to 207.786. (H) The commercial rehabilitation act, 2005 PA 210, MCL 207.841 to 207.856. (I) The attainable housing facilities act, 2022 PA 236, MCL 207.901 to 207.916. (J) The residential housing facilities act, 2022 PA 237, MCL 207.951 to 207.966. (ii) That portion of the tax levied under the tax reverted clean title act, 2003 PA 260, MCL 211.1021 to 211.1025a, that is not required to be distributed to a land bank fast track authority. (ccc) "State brownfield redevelopment fund" means the state brownfield redevelopment fund created in section 8a. (ddd) "Targeted redevelopment area" means not fewer than 40 and not more than 500 contiguous parcels of real property located in a qualified local governmental unit and designated as a targeted redevelopment area by resolution of the governing body and approved by the Michigan strategic fund. A qualified local governmental unit is limited to designating no more than 2 targeted redevelopment areas for the purposes of this section in a calendar year. The Michigan strategic fund may approve no more than 5 targeted redevelopment areas for the purposes of this section in a calendar year. (eee) "Tax increment revenues" means the amount of ad valorem property taxes and specific taxes attributable to the application of the levy of all taxing jurisdictions on the captured taxable value of each parcel of eligible property subject to a brownfield plan and personal property located on that property, regardless of whether those taxes began to be levied after the brownfield plan was adopted. Tax increment revenues also include the amount of any payment in lieu of taxes under section 15a(3) of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1415a, paid on an eligible property subject to a brownfield plan, less the amount of property taxes levied on the eligible property subject to the brownfield plan for the year the eligible property became subject to the brownfield plan. Tax increment revenues do not include any of the following: (i) Ad valorem property taxes specifically levied for the payment of principal of and interest on either obligations approved by the electors or obligations pledging the unlimited taxing power of the local governmental unit, and specific taxes attributable to those ad valorem property taxes. (ii) For tax increment revenues attributable to eligible property, the amount of ad valorem property taxes or specific taxes captured by a downtown development authority under part 2 of the recodified tax increment financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL 125.4201 to 125.4230, tax increment finance authority under part 3 of the recodified tax increment financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL 125.4301 to 125.4329, corridor improvement authority under part 6 of the recodified tax increment financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL 125.4602 to 125.4629, or local development finance authority under part 4 of the recodified tax increment financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL 125.4401 to 125.4420, if those taxes were captured by these other authorities on the date that eligible property became subject to a brownfield plan under this act, unless these other authorities agree to forgo or transfer their taxes in support of the brownfield plan. (iii) Ad valorem property taxes levied under 1 or more of the following or specific taxes attributable to those ad valorem property taxes: (A) The zoological authorities act, 2008 PA 49, MCL 123.1161 to 123.1183. (B) The art institute authorities act, 2010 PA 296, MCL 123.1201 to 123.1229. (fff) "Taxable value" means the value determined under section 27a of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.27a. (ggg) "Taxes levied for school operating purposes" means all of the following: (i) The taxes levied by a local school district for operating purposes. (ii) The taxes levied under the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906. (iii) That portion of specific taxes attributable to taxes described under subparagraphs (i) and (ii). (hhh) "Transformational brownfield plan" means a brownfield plan that meets the requirements of section 13c and is adopted under section 14a and, as designated by resolution of the governing body and approved by the Michigan strategic fund, will have a transformational impact on local economic development and community revitalization based on the extent of brownfield redevelopment and growth in population, commercial activity, and employment that will result from the plan. To be designated a transformational brownfield plan, a transformational brownfield plan under this subdivision must be for mixed-use development unless waived by the Michigan strategic fund as provided under section 14a(26) and must be expected to result in the following levels of capital investment: (i) In a municipality that is not a county and that has a population of not less than 600,000, $500,000,000.00. (ii) In a municipality that is not a county and that has a population of not less than 150,000 and not more than 599,999, $100,000,000.00. (iii) In a municipality that is not a county and that has a population of not less than 100,000 and not more than 149,999, $75,000,000.00. (iv) In a municipality that is not a county and that has a population of not less than 50,000 and not more than 99,999, $50,000,000.00. (v) In a municipality that is not a county and that has a population of not less than 25,000 and not more than 49,999, $25,000,000.00. (vi) In a municipality that is not a county and that has a population of less than 25,000, $15,000,000.00. (iii) "Transit-oriented development" means infrastructure improvements that are located within 1/2 mile of a transit station or transit-oriented property that promotes transit ridership or passenger rail use as determined by the board and approved by the municipality in which it is located. (jjj) "Transit-oriented property" means property that houses a transit station in a manner that promotes transit ridership or passenger rail use. (kkk) "Use tax" means the tax levied under the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.91 to 205.111, including both the local community stabilization share and the state share as those terms are defined in section 2c of the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.92c. (lll) "Withholding tax capture revenues" means, with respect to each eligible property subject to a transformational brownfield plan, the amount for each calendar year by which the income tax withheld under chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.701 to 206.715, 206.718, from individuals employed within the eligible property exceeds the initial withholding tax value. Withholding tax capture revenues do not include income tax from individuals domiciled within the eligible property or construction period tax capture revenues. To calculate withholding tax capture revenues for a calendar year under a transformational brownfield plan, the state treasurer or the Michigan strategic fund shall do all of the following: (i) The state treasurer shall require the owner or developer of the eligible property to provide the department of treasury with notice not more than 10 days from the date an employer commences or terminates occupancy within the eligible property. As used in this subdivision, "employer" means that term as defined in section 8 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.8. (ii) The state treasurer shall develop methods and processes that are necessary for each employer occupying the eligible property to report the amount of withholding under chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.701 to 206.715, 206.718, from individuals employed within the eligible property. (iii) The Michigan strategic fund shall include the following provisions in the development or reimbursement agreement for any transformational brownfield plan that utilizes withholding tax capture revenues: (A) That the owner or developer of the eligible property shall require each employer occupying the eligible property to comply with the reporting requirements under this section through a contract requirement, lease requirement, or other similar means. (B) That reimbursement of withholding tax capture revenues is limited to amounts that are reported in accordance with chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.701 to 206.715, 206.718, and this state has no obligation with respect to withholding tax capture revenues that are not reported or paid. (iv) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subdivision, instead of the reporting and calculation methods otherwise provided for, the owner or developer of a transformational project site may elect to utilize a safe harbor method of calculating withholding tax capture revenues. Under this safe harbor method, the Michigan strategic fund shall establish a safe harbor amount of annual withholding tax capture revenues for each eligible property when the Michigan strategic fund approves the transformational brownfield plan, and those amounts shall serve as the basis for the transmittal of withholding tax capture revenues to the owner or developer of the transformational project site under section 8a(4). The Michigan strategic fund shall establish the safe harbor amount for an eligible property by imputing a standard level of employee occupancy that corresponds to the size and use of the eligible property or portion of the eligible property and a safe harbor average annual taxable wage for the individuals employed within the eligible property or portion of the eligible property. The safe harbor is effective only to the extent the eligible property or portion of the eligible property is actively occupied, as evidenced by the existence of a binding lease agreement or similar instrument. Imputations as to occupancy and wages may vary between projects based on location, the type and use of the eligible property, and other relevant factors. The Michigan strategic fund may adjust the safe harbor amount for an eligible property, or portion of the eligible property, after the time of plan approval as required to reflect changes in the transformational brownfield plan for the transformational project site that may occur after approval of the transformational brownfield plan, if those changes do not result in an aggregate increase in the level of withholding tax capture revenues from the amount initially established. The owner or developer of the transformational project site may elect to utilize the safe harbor method of accounting at any time before the first reimbursement of withholding tax capture revenues under the plan. An election to utilize the safe harbor method of accounting, once made, cannot be rescinded. (mmm) "Work plan" means a plan that describes each individual activity to be conducted to complete eligible activities and the associated costs of each individual activity. (nnn) "Zone" means, for an authority established before June 6, 2000, a brownfield redevelopment zone designated under this act. Sec. 12. (1) The authority may borrow money and issue its negotiable revenue bonds or notes to finance all or part of the costs of eligible activities or of another activity of the authority under this act. Revenue bonds and notes issued under this section are subject to the revenue bond act of 1933, 1933 PA 94, MCL 141.101 to 141.140. The authority may secure the bonds and notes by mortgage, assignment, or pledge of the property and all money, revenues, or income received in connection with the property. The costs that may be financed by the issuance of revenue bonds or notes may include the all of the following: (a) The costs of purchasing, acquiring, constructing, improving, enlarging, extending, or repairing property in connection with an activity authorized under this act. ; engineering, (b) Engineering, architectural, legal, accounting, or financial expenses. ; the (c) The costs necessary or incidental to the borrowing of money. ; interest (d) Interest on the bonds or notes during the period of construction. ; a (e) A reserve for payment of principal and interest on the bonds or notes. ; and a (f) A reserve for operation and maintenance until sufficient revenues have developed. The authority may secure the bonds and notes by mortgage, assignment, or pledge of the property and all money, revenues, or income received in connection with the property. (2) A pledge made by the authority shall be is valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The money or property pledged by the authority immediately shall be is subject to the lien of the pledge without a physical delivery, filing, or further act. The lien of a pledge shall be is valid and binding as against parties having claims in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether the parties have notice of the lien. Filing of the resolution, the trust agreement, or another instrument by which a pledge is created is not required. (3) Bonds or notes issued under this section shall be are exempt from all taxation in this state except estate and transfer taxes, and the interest on the bonds or notes shall be is exempt from all taxation in this state, notwithstanding that the interest may be subject to federal income tax. (4) Unless otherwise provided by a majority vote of the members of its governing body, the municipality shall is not be liable on bonds or notes of the authority issued under this section and the bonds or notes shall are not be a debt of the municipality. (5) The bonds and notes of the authority may be invested in by all of the following: (a) The state treasurer and all other public officers. , state (b) State agencies and political subdivisions. , insurance (c) Insurance companies. , banks, (d) Banks, savings and loan associations, investment and other financial institutions. (e) Investment companies. , and fiduciaries (f) Fiduciaries and trustees. , and (6) The bonds and notes of the authority may be deposited with and received by the state treasurer and all other public officers and the agencies and political subdivisions of this state for all purposes for which the deposit of bonds or notes is authorized. (7) The authority granted by this section is supplemental and in addition to all other authority granted by law. Sec. 13. (1) When adopting a brownfield plan, the board shall comply with the notice and approval provisions of section 14. (2) Subject to section 15, the board may implement a brownfield plan. The brownfield plan may apply to 1 or more parcels of eligible property whether or not those parcels of eligible property are contiguous and may be amended to apply to additional parcels of eligible property. Except as otherwise authorized by this act, if more than 1 eligible property is included within the plan, the tax increment revenues under the plan must be determined individually for each eligible property. Each plan or an amendment to a plan must be approved by the governing body of the municipality and must contain all of the following: (a) A description of the costs of the plan intended to be paid for with the tax increment revenues or, for a plan for eligible properties qualified on the basis that the property is owned by or under the control of a land bank fast track authority, a listing of all eligible activities that may be conducted for 1 or more of the eligible properties subject to the plan. (b) A brief summary of the eligible activities that are proposed for each eligible property or, for a plan for eligible properties qualified on the basis that the property is owned by or under the control of a land bank fast track authority, a brief summary of eligible activities conducted for 1 or more of the eligible properties subject to the plan. (c) An estimate of the captured taxable value and tax increment revenues for each year of the plan from the eligible property. The plan may provide for the use of part or all of the captured taxable value, including deposits in the local brownfield revolving fund, but the portion intended to be used must be clearly stated in the plan. The plan must not provide either for an exclusion from captured taxable value of a portion of the captured taxable value or for an exclusion of the tax levy of 1 or more taxing jurisdictions unless the tax levy is excluded from tax increment revenues in section 2(eee), or unless the tax levy is excluded from capture under section 15. (d) The method by which the costs of the plan will be financed, including a description of any advances made or anticipated to be made for the costs of the plan from the municipality. (e) The maximum amount of note or bonded indebtedness to be incurred, if any. (f) The proposed beginning date and duration of capture of tax increment revenues for each eligible property as determined under section 13b(16). (g) An estimate of the future tax revenues of all taxing jurisdictions in which the eligible property is located to be generated during the term of the plan. (h) A legal description of the eligible property to which the plan applies, a map showing the location and dimensions of each eligible property, a statement of the characteristics that qualify the property as eligible property, and a statement of whether personal property is included as part of the eligible property. If the project is on property that is functionally obsolete, the taxpayer shall include, with the application, an affidavit signed by a level 3 or level 4 assessor, that states that it is the assessor's expert opinion that the property is functionally obsolete and the underlying basis for that opinion. (i) Estimates of the number of persons residing on each eligible property to which the plan applies and the number of families and individuals to be displaced. If occupied residences are designated for acquisition and clearance by the authority, the plan must include a demographic survey of the persons to be displaced, a statistical description of the housing supply in the community, including the number of private and public units in existence or under construction, the condition of those in existence, the number of owner-occupied and renter-occupied units, the annual rate of turnover of the various types of housing and the range of rents and sale prices, an estimate of the total demand for housing in the community, and the estimated capacity of private and public housing available to displaced families and individuals. (j) A plan for establishing priority for the relocation of persons displaced by implementation of the plan. (k) Provision for the costs of relocating persons displaced by implementation of the plan, and financial assistance and reimbursement of expenses, including litigation expenses and expenses incident to the transfer of title, in accordance with the uniform relocation assistance and real property acquisition policies act of 1970, Public Law 91-646. (l) A strategy for compliance with 1972 PA 227, MCL 213.321 to 213.332. (m) Other material that the authority or governing body considers pertinent to the brownfield plan. (3) If taxes levied for school operating purposes are subject to capture under section 15, the percentage of school operating tax increment revenues captured relating to a parcel of eligible property under a brownfield plan must not be greater than the percentage of local tax increment revenues that are captured under the brownfield plan relating to that parcel of eligible property, unless there is another approved local contribution to the project that provides a value reasonably equivalent to that percentage of local capture. (4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) and sections 8, 13b(4) and (5), and 13c(12), tax increment revenues related to a brownfield plan must be used only for 1 or more of the following: (a) Costs of eligible activities attributable to the eligible property that produces the tax increment revenues. (b) Eligible activities attributable to any eligible property for property that is owned by or under the control of a land bank fast track authority or a qualified local governmental unit. (5) A brownfield plan must authorize the capture of tax increment revenue from eligible property for a period of not less than 20 years, but not more than 30 years, from the beginning date of the capture of the tax increment revenues for that eligible property, except that a brownfield plan may only not authorize the capture of tax increment revenue from eligible property until after the year in date on which the total amount of tax increment revenues captured is equal to the sum of the costs permitted to be funded with tax increment revenues under this act. or for not more than 30 years from the beginning date of the capture of the tax increment revenues for that eligible property, whichever occurs first. A brownfield plan may authorize the capture of additional local and school operating tax increment revenue from an eligible property for the local brownfield revolving fund created under section 8 during 1 or more of the following time frames: (a) The time of capture described in this subsection for the purpose of paying the costs permitted under subsection (4) or section 13b(4). (b) For not more than 5 years after the date specified in subdivision (a). Sec. 13b. (1) An authority shall not expend tax increment revenues to acquire or prepare eligible property unless the acquisition or preparation is an eligible activity. (2) An authority shall not enter into agreements with the taxing jurisdictions and the governing body of the municipality to share a portion of the taxes captured from an eligible property under this act, unless the agreement is related to another tax increment finance authority that has been established under the recodified tax increment finance act, 2018 PA 57, MCL 125.4101 to 125.4915, forgoing or transferring its tax capture to allow an authority to instead capture and utilize those taxes to pay for the eligible activities for an eligible property and only for a period of time not to exceed the duration of the plan for that eligible property. On adoption of the plan, the collection and transmission of the amount of tax increment revenues as specified in this act are binding on all taxing units levying ad valorem property taxes or specific taxes against property located in the zone. (3) Tax increment revenues captured from taxes levied by this state under the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, or taxes levied by a local school district must not be used to assist a land bank fast track authority with clearing or quieting title, acquiring, selling, or conveying property, except as provided in subsection (4). (4) If a brownfield plan includes the use of taxes levied for school operating purposes captured from an eligible property for eligible activities that are not department specific activities, then 1 or more of the following apply: (a) A combined brownfield plan or a work plan must be approved by the Michigan strategic fund and a development agreement or reimbursement agreement between the municipality or authority and an owner or developer of eligible property is required before such tax increment may be used for any of the following: (i) Infrastructure improvements that directly benefit eligible property. (ii) Demolition of structures that is not response activity. (iii) Lead, mold, or asbestos abatement that is not a department specific activity. (iv) Site preparation that is not response activity. (v) Relocation of public buildings or operations for economic development purposes. (vi) Acquisition of property by a land bank fast track authority if acquisition of the property is for economic development purposes. (vii) Eligible activities described in section 2(o)(vii). (b) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, if the work plan or combined brownfield plan is requesting reimbursement for housing development activities, the work plan or combined brownfield plan must be approved by the Michigan state housing development authority and a development agreement or reimbursement agreement between the municipality or authority and an owner or developer of eligible property that stipulates price and income monitoring for residential units is required before such tax increment may be used for housing development activities. A work plan or combined brownfield plan is not required to be approved by the Michigan state housing development authority under this subdivision if all of the housing property for which housing development activities are identified under the plan will be sold or rented at a market rate and will not be subsidized. (c) Approval of a combined brownfield plan or a work plan by the Michigan strategic fund in the manner required under section 15(12) to (14) or (20) is required to use the tax increment revenues to assist a land bank fast track authority or qualified local governmental unit with clearing or quieting title, acquiring, selling, or conveying property. (d) The combined brownfield plan or work plan to be submitted to the Michigan strategic fund or Michigan state housing development authority under this subsection must be in a form prescribed by the Michigan strategic fund or the Michigan state housing development authority, as applicable. (e) The eligible activities to be conducted and described in this subsection must be consistent with the combined brownfield plan or work plan submitted by the authority to the Michigan strategic fund or the Michigan state housing development authority, or both, as applicable. (f) The department's approval is not required for the capture of taxes levied for school operating purposes for eligible activities described in this section. (5) If a brownfield plan includes the use of taxes levied for school operating purposes captured from eligible property for department specific activities, a combined brownfield plan or a work plan must be approved by the department with the exception of those activities identified in subsections (8) and (9). (6) An authority shall not do any of the following: (a) Use taxes captured from eligible property to pay for eligible activities conducted before approval of the brownfield plan. (b) Use taxes captured from eligible property to pay for administrative and operating activities of the authority or the municipality on behalf of the authority for activities, other than those identified in subsection (7). (c) Use taxes levied for school operating purposes captured from eligible property for activities other than those identified in subsections (4), (5), and (12). (d) Use construction period tax capture revenues, withholding tax capture revenues, income tax capture revenues, or sales and use tax capture revenues to pay for eligible activities conducted before approval of the transformational brownfield plan except for costs described in section 13c(10). (e) Use construction period tax capture revenues, withholding tax capture revenues, income tax capture revenues, and sales and use tax capture revenues for any expense other than as provided for in section 13c(2), except for the reasonable costs for preparing a transformational brownfield plan and the additional administrative and operating expenses of the authority or municipality as are specifically associated with the implementation of a transformational brownfield plan. For purposes of this subsection, the reasonable costs of preparing a transformational brownfield plan include the reasonable costs of preparing an associated work plan, combined brownfield plan, and development or reimbursement agreement. (7) An authority may use taxes captured from eligible property to pay for the administrative and operating costs under 1 or more of the following: (a) Local taxes captured may be used for 1 or more of the following administrative and operating purposes: (i) Reasonable and actual administrative and operating expenses of the authority, including costs to implement, monitor, and maintain compliance with the income and price monitoring responsibilities associated with housing development activities. (ii) Department specific activities conducted by or on behalf of the authority related directly to work conducted on prospective eligible properties before approval of the brownfield plan. (iii) Reasonable costs of developing and preparing brownfield plans, combined plans, or work plans for which tax increment revenues may be used under subsection (4), including, but not limited to, both of the following: (A) Legal and consulting fees that are not in the ordinary course of acquiring and developing real estate. (B) Fees and expenses, including licensing, permitting, planning, engineering, architectural, testing, legal, and accounting fees, not described in sub-subparagraph (A). (iv) Reasonable cost of brownfield plan or work plan implementation, including, but not limited to, tracking and reporting data and plan compliance and costs to implement, monitor, and maintain compliance with the income and price monitoring responsibilities associated with housing development activities. (b) Taxes levied for school operating purposes may be used for 1 or more of the following administrative and operating purposes: (i) Reasonable costs of developing and preparing brownfield plans, combined brownfield plans, or work plans for which tax increment revenues may be used under section 13(4), including, but not limited to, both of the following: (A) Legal and consulting fees that are not in the ordinary course of acquiring and developing real estate, not to exceed $30,000.00. (B) Fees and expenses, including licensing, permitting, planning, engineering, architectural, testing, legal, and accounting fees, not described in sub-subparagraph (A). (ii) Reasonable costs of brownfield plan or work plan implementation, including, but not limited to, tracking and reporting of data and plan compliance, and costs to implement, monitor, and maintain compliance with the income and price monitoring responsibilities associated with housing development activities, not to exceed $50,000.00. (c) In each fiscal year of the authority, the amount of tax increment revenues attributable to local taxes that an authority may use for the purposes described in subdivisions (a) and (b) is determined as follows: (i) For authorities that have 5 or fewer active projects, $125,000.00. (ii) For authorities that have 6 or more but fewer than 11 active projects, $165,000.00. (iii) For authorities that have 11 or more but fewer than 16 active projects, $200,000.00. (iv) For authorities that have 16 or more but fewer than 21 active projects, $225,000.00. (v) For authorities that have 21 or more but fewer than 26 active projects, $250,000.00. (vi) For authorities that have 26 or more but fewer than 31 active projects, $400,000.00. (vii) For authorities that have 31 or more but fewer than 54 active projects, $650,000.00. (viii) For authorities that have 54 or more but fewer than 74 active projects, $900,000.00. (ix) For authorities that have 74 or more but fewer than 99 active projects, $1,400,000.00. (x) For authorities that have 99 or more active projects, $2,000,000.00. (d) This subsection does not limit the amount of funds that may be granted, loaned, or expended by a local brownfield revolving fund for eligible activities. (e) As used in this subsection, "active project" means either a project for which the authority is currently capturing taxes under this act or a project for which an authority has ongoing obligations to implement, monitor, or maintain compliance with the income and price monitoring responsibilities associated with housing development activities, or both. The amounts of tax increment revenues attributable to local taxes listed in this subsection that an authority can use for the purposes described in this subsection may be increased by 2% for each written agreement entered into by an authority in either of the following situations up to a total maximum increase of 10%: (i) The authority is an authority established by a county and that authority enters into a written agreement with 1 or more municipalities within that county to serve as the only authority for those other municipalities. (ii) The authority enters into a written agreement with 1 or more other authorities to administer 1 or more administrative operations of those other authorities. (8) The limitations of subsections (4), (5), and (6) on the use of taxes levied for school operating purposes do not apply to the costs of 1 or more of the following incurred by a person other than the authority: (a) Site investigation activities required to conduct a baseline environmental assessment and to evaluate compliance with sections 20107a and 21304c of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.20107a and 324.21304c. (b) Completing a baseline environmental assessment. (c) Preparing a plan for compliance with sections 20107a and 21304c of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.20107a and 324.21304c. (d) Performing pre-demolition and building hazardous materials surveys. (e) Asbestos, mold, and lead surveys. (f) Asbestos, mold, lead, and building hazardous materials abatement and demolition, in an amount not to exceed $250,000.00. (9) The limitations of subsections (4), (5), and (6) on the use of local taxes and taxes levied for school operating purposes do not apply to the following costs and expenses: (a) For tax increment revenues attributable to taxes levied for school operating purposes, eligible activities associated with unanticipated response activities conducted on eligible property if that eligible property has been included in a brownfield plan, the department is consulted in writing on the unanticipated response activities before they are conducted, and the costs of those activities are subsequently included in a brownfield plan, combined brownfield plan or a work plan or amendment approved by the authority and approved by the department. (b) For tax increment revenues attributable to local taxes, any eligible activities conducted on eligible property or prospective eligible properties before approval of the brownfield plan, if those costs and the eligible property are subsequently included in a brownfield plan approved by the authority. (c) For tax increment revenues attributable to taxes levied for school operating purposes, eligible activities described in subsection (4) and conducted on eligible property or prospective eligible properties before approval of the brownfield plan, if those costs and the eligible property are subsequently included in a brownfield plan approved by the authority and a combined brownfield plan or work plan approved by the Michigan strategic fund or the Michigan state housing development authority, or both, as applicable. (d) Reasonable cost of developing and preparing brownfield plans, combined brownfield plans, or work plans for which tax increment revenues may be used under section 13(4), including, but not limited to, legal and consulting fees that are not in the ordinary course of acquiring and developing real estate. (e) Reasonable cost of brownfield plan or work plan implementation, including, but not limited to, tracking and reporting of data and plan compliance. (10) An authority shall not use taxes levied for school operating purposes captured from eligible property for response activities that benefit a party responsible for an activity causing a release under section 20126 or 21323a of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.20126 and 324.21323a, except that a municipality that established the authority may use taxes levied for school operating purposes captured from eligible property for response activities associated with a landfill. (11) A brownfield authority may reimburse advances, with or without interest, made by a municipality under section 7(3), a land bank fast track authority, or any other person or entity for costs of eligible activities with any source of revenue available for use of the brownfield authority under this act. (12) A brownfield authority may capture taxes for the payment of interest, as follows: (a) If an authority reimburses a person or entity under this section for an advance for the payment or reimbursement of the cost of eligible activities and interest thereon, the authority may capture local taxes for the payment of that interest. (b) If an authority reimburses a person or entity under this section for an advance for the payment or reimbursement of the cost of department specific activities and interest thereon included in a combined brownfield plan or a work plan approved by the department, the authority may capture taxes levied for school operating purposes and local taxes for the payment of that interest. (c) If an authority reimburses a person or entity under this section for an advance for the payment or reimbursement of the cost of eligible activities that are not department specific activities and interest thereon included in a combined brownfield plan or a work plan approved by the Michigan strategic fund or the Michigan state housing development authority, or both, as applicable, the authority may capture taxes levied for school operating purposes and local taxes for the payment of that interest if the Michigan strategic fund or the Michigan state housing development authority, as applicable, grants an approval for the capture of taxes levied for school operating purposes to pay that interest. (13) An authority may enter into agreements related to these reimbursements and payments described in this section. A reimbursement agreement for these purposes and the obligations under that reimbursement agreement are not subject to section 13 or the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821. (14) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this act, for a brownfield plan that includes the capture of taxes levied for school operating purposes from each eligible property included in a brownfield plan after January 1, 2013, an authority shall pay to the department of treasury at least once annually an amount equal to 50% of the taxes levied under the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, including 50% of that portion of specific taxes attributable to, but not levied under, the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, that are captured under the brownfield plan until the expiration of the earlier of the following: (a) Twenty-five years of capture of tax increment revenues from such eligible property included in the brownfield plan. (b) The later of the following: (i) The date of repayment of all eligible expenses relative to such eligible property. (ii) The date excess capture is terminated under subsection (16). (15) The department of treasury shall deposit the amounts described in subsection (14) into the state brownfield redevelopment fund. If an authority makes a payment as required under subsection (14) to the department of treasury, the local taxes levied on that parcel and used to reimburse eligible activities under a brownfield plan must not be increased or decreased due to that payment. If, due to an appeal of any tax assessment, an authority is required to reimburse a taxpayer for any portion of the amount paid to the department of treasury under this subsection, the department of treasury shall reimburse that amount to the authority within 30 days after receiving a request from the authority for reimbursement. (16) The brownfield plan must include a proposed beginning date of capture. If the actual beginning date of capture of tax increment revenues is later than 5 years following the date of the adoption of the brownfield plan resolution, then the maximum number of years of capture will decrease. The end date of capture must be no later than 35 years after the date of the adoption of the brownfield plan resolution. The authority may amend the beginning date of capture of tax increment revenues for a particular eligible property as long as the authority has not begun to reimburse eligible activities from the capture of tax increment revenues from that eligible property. Any tax increment revenues captured from an eligible property before the beginning date of capture of tax increment revenues for that eligible property must revert proportionately to the respective tax bodies.